California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) In the case of outstanding final liabilities assessed by the Franchise Tax Board, this section shall be operative within 60 days after the Contractors State License Board has provided the Franchise Tax Board with the information required under Section 30, relating to licensing information that includes the federal employer identification number, individual taxpayer identification number, or social security number.

(d) All versions of the application for a contractor’s license shall include, as part of the application, an authorization by the applicant, in the form and manner mutually agreeable to the Franchise Tax Board and the board, for the Franchise Tax Board to disclose the tax information that is required for the registrar to administer this section. The
 Franchise Tax Board may from time to time audit these authorizations.

(e) In the case of outstanding final liabilities assessed by the State Board of Equalization, this section shall not apply to any outstanding final liability if the licensee has entered into an installment payment agreement for that liability with the State Board of Equalization and is in compliance with the terms of that agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 72.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Home Improvement Business [7150. - 7170.]

7150.

(a) “Person” as used in this article is limited to natural persons, notwithstanding the definition of person in Section 7025.

(b) “Senior citizen” means an individual who is 65 years of age or older.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.   (AB 2471)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7150.1.

A home improvement contractor, including a swimming pool contractor, is a contractor as defined and licensed under this chapter who is engaged in the business of home improvement either full time or part time. A home improvement contractor shall satisfy all requirements imposed by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 888, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

7151.

(a) “Home improvement” means the repairing, remodeling, altering, converting, or modernizing of, or adding to, residential property, as well as the reconstruction, restoration, or rebuilding of a residential property that is damaged or destroyed by a natural disaster for which a state of emergency is proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code, or for which an emergency or major disaster is declared by the President of the United States, and shall include, but not be limited to, the construction, erection, installation, replacement, or improvement of driveways, swimming pools, including spas and hot tubs, terraces, patios, awnings, storm windows, solar energy systems, landscaping, fences, porches, garages, fallout
 shelters, basements, and other improvements of the structures or land which is adjacent to a dwelling house. “Home improvement” shall also mean the installation of home improvement goods or the furnishing of home improvement services.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “home improvement goods or services” means goods and services, as defined in Section 1689.5 of the Civil Code, which are bought in connection with the improvement of real property. Such home improvement goods and services include, but are not limited to, carpeting, texture coating, fencing, air conditioning or heating equipment, and termite extermination. Home improvement goods include goods which are to be so affixed to real property as to become a part of real property whether or not severable therefrom.

(c) For purposes of this article, “solar energy system” means a solar energy device to be installed on a residential building or residential property that has the primary purpose of providing for the collection and distribution of solar energy for the generation of electricity, that produces at least one kilowatt, and not more than five megawatts, alternating current rated peak electricity, and that meets or exceeds the eligibility criteria established pursuant to Section 25782 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 249, Sec. 1.   (SB 757)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7151.2.

“Home improvement contract” means an agreement, whether oral or written, or contained in one or more documents, between a contractor and an owner or between a contractor and a tenant, regardless of the number of residence or dwelling units contained in the building in which the tenant resides, if the work is to be performed in, to, or upon the residence or dwelling unit of the tenant, for the performance of a home improvement as defined in Section 7151, and includes all labor, services, and materials to be furnished and performed thereunder. “Home improvement contract” also means an agreement, whether oral or written, or contained in one or more
 documents, between a salesperson, whether or not he or she is a home improvement salesperson, and (a) an owner or (b) a tenant, regardless of the number of residence or dwelling units contained in the building in which the tenant resides, which provides for the sale, installation, or furnishing of home improvement goods or services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1160, Sec. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

7152.

(a) “Home improvement salesperson” is a person who is registered under this chapter and engaged in the business of soliciting, selling, negotiating, or executing contracts for home improvements, for the sale, installation, or furnishing of home improvement goods or services, or of swimming pools, spas, or hot tubs on behalf of a home improvement contractor licensed under this chapter.

(b) A home improvement salesperson shall register with the board in order to engage in the business of, or act in the capacity of, a home improvement salesperson.

(c) Subject to the provisions of Section 7154, a home improvement
 salesperson may be employed by one, or more than one, home improvement contractor. However, prior to engaging in any activity described in subdivision (a) of this section, a home improvement salesperson shall identify to the owner or tenant the business name and license number of the contractor they are representing for the purposes of that transaction. Failure to do so is a cause of disciplinary action within the meaning of Section 7155.

(d) The following shall not be required to be registered as home improvement salespersons:

(1) An officer of record of a corporation licensed pursuant to this chapter, or a manager, member, or officer of record of a limited liability company licensed pursuant to this chapter.

(2) A
 general partner listed on the license record of a partnership licensed pursuant to this chapter.

(3) A qualifying person, as defined in Section 7025.

(4) A salesperson whose sales are all made pursuant to negotiations between the parties if the negotiations are initiated by the prospective buyer at or with a general merchandise retail establishment that operates from a fixed location where goods or services are offered for sale.

(5) A person who contacts the prospective buyer for the exclusive purpose of scheduling appointments for a registered home improvement salesperson.

(6) A bona fide service repairperson who is in the employ of a licensed contractor and
 whose repair or service call is limited to the service, repair, or emergency repair initially requested by the buyer of the service.

(e) The exemption to registration provided under paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (d) shall apply only to those individuals who, at the time of the sales transaction, are listed as personnel of record for the licensee responsible for soliciting, negotiating, or contracting for a service or improvement that is subject to regulation under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 20.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7153.

(a) It is a misdemeanor for any person to engage in the occupation of salesperson for one or more home improvement contractors within this state without having, at the time of the sales transaction, a current and valid home improvement salesperson registration issued by the registrar. If, upon investigation, the registrar has probable cause to believe that a salesperson is in violation of this section, the registrar may issue a citation pursuant to Section 7028.7.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to engage in the occupation of salesperson of home improvement goods or services within this state without having, at the time of the sales transaction, a current and
 valid home improvement salesperson registration issued by the registrar.

(b) Any security interest taken by a contractor, to secure any payment for the performance of any act or conduct described in Section 7151 that occurs on or after January 1, 1995, is unenforceable if the person soliciting the act or contract was not a duly registered salesperson or was not exempt from registration pursuant to Section 7152 at the time the homeowner signs the home improvement contract solicited by the salesperson.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 281, Sec. 3.   (SB 561)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7153.1.

(a) The home improvement salesperson shall submit to the registrar an application in writing containing the statement that he or she desires the issuance of a registration under the terms of this article.

The application shall be made on a form prescribed by the registrar and shall be accompanied by the fee fixed by this chapter.

(b) The registrar may refuse to register the applicant under the grounds specified in
 Section 480.

(c) As part of an application for a home improvement salesperson, the board shall require an applicant to furnish a full set of fingerprints for purposes of conducting criminal history record checks. Fingerprints furnished pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in an electronic format where readily available. Requests for alternative methods of furnishing fingerprints are subject to the approval of the registrar. The board shall use the fingerprints furnished by an applicant to obtain criminal history information on the applicant from the Department of Justice and the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation, including any subsequent arrest information available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 240, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7153.2.

All home improvement salesperson registrations issued under the provisions of this article shall expire two years from the last day of the month in which the registration was issued, or two years from the date on which the renewed registration last expired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 281, Sec. 4.   (SB 561)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7153.3.

(a) To renew a home improvement salesperson registration, which has not expired, the registrant shall before the time at which the registration would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the registrar and pay a renewal fee prescribed by this chapter. Renewal of an unexpired registration shall continue the registration in effect for the two-year period following the expiration date of the registration, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

(b) An application for renewal of registration is delinquent if the application is not postmarked or received via electronic transmission as authorized by Section 7156.6 by the date on which the registration would otherwise expire. A
 registration may, however, still be renewed at any time within three years after its expiration upon the filing of an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the registrar and the payment of the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter and a delinquent renewal penalty equal to 50 percent of the renewal fee. If a registration is not renewed within three years, the person shall make a new application for registration pursuant to Section 7153.1.

(c) (1) The registrar may refuse to renew a registration for failure by the registrant to complete the application for renewal of registration. If a registrant fails to return the application rejected for insufficiency or incompleteness within 90 days from the original date of rejection, the application and fee shall be deemed abandoned. Any application abandoned may not be reinstated. However, the person may file a new application for registration pursuant to Section
 7153.1.

(2) The registrar may review and accept the petition of a person who disputes the abandonment of his or her renewal application upon a showing of good cause. This petition shall be received within 90 days of the date the application for renewal is deemed abandoned.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 38) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 799, Sec. 39.   (SB 1039)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7154.

(a) A home improvement contractor licensed under this chapter shall notify the registrar in writing, on a form prescribed by the registrar, about the employment of a registered home improvement salesperson, pursuant to the terms of this article. This notification requirement shall include, but not be limited to, the name and registration number of the home improvement salesperson who is employed by the contractor. The form shall be submitted prior to the home improvement salesperson beginning work for the contractor.

(b) A home improvement contractor shall notify the registrar in writing, on a form prescribed by the registrar, when a registered home
 improvement salesperson ceases to be employed by the contractor. This notification requirement shall include, but not be limited to, the name and registration number of the home improvement salesperson who had been employed by the contractor. The form shall be submitted within 90 days after the home improvement salesperson ceases to be employed by the contractor.

(c) A home improvement contractor who employs a registered home improvement salesperson to sell home improvement contracts, but who fails to report to the registrar pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), is subject to disciplinary action by the registrar.

(d) A home improvement contractor who employs a person to sell home improvement contracts while that person is not registered by the registrar as a home
 improvement salesperson as provided in this article, is subject to disciplinary action by the registrar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 281, Sec. 6.   (SB 561)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7155.

Violation of any provision of this chapter by a home improvement salesperson constitutes cause for disciplinary action. The registrar may suspend or revoke the registration of the home improvement salesperson if he or she is found to be in violation. The disciplinary proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 16.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7155.5.

Violations of any provisions of this chapter by a home improvement salesperson likewise constitute cause for disciplinary action against the contractor by whom he or she was employed at the time the violation occurred, whether or not the contractor had knowledge of or participated in the act or omission constituting violations of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 281, Sec. 7.   (SB 561)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7156.

It shall be a misdemeanor and a cause for disciplinary action to commit any of the following acts:

(a) For any home improvement salesperson to fail to account for or to remit to their employing contractor any payment received in connection with any home improvement transaction or any other transaction involving a work of improvement.

(b) For any person to use a contract form in connection with any home improvement transaction or any other transaction involving a work of improvement if the form fails to disclose the name of the contractor principal by whom the person is employed.

(c) For any home improvement salesperson to assist, recommend, select, or otherwise guide an owner or tenant in the selection of a contractor for the performance or sale of home improvement goods or services if notification of employment by the home improvement contractor, as required by subdivision (a) of Section 7154, has not been received by the Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 249, Sec. 3.   (SB 757)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7156.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the board may implement a system that provides for the electronic transmission of an initial application or renewal application for the registration required by this article and the electronic transmission of the notices required by Section 7154.

(b) The board by regulation may specify the form and manner of these transmissions, including the adoption of any protocols necessary to ensure the validity and security of any information, data, or document transmitted electronically. Upon the effective date of the regulations, the electronic submission of an initial registration application, a renewal application, or the electronic transmission
 of a notice required by Section 7154 shall satisfy the requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 281, Sec. 9.   (SB 561)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7157.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), as a part of or in connection with the inducement to enter into any home improvement contract or other contract, which may be performed by a contractor, no person may promise or offer to pay, credit, or allow to any owner, compensation or reward for the procurement or placing of home improvement business with others.

(b) A contractor or his or her agent or salesperson may give tangible items to prospective customers for
 advertising or sales promotion purposes where the gift is not conditioned upon obtaining a contract for home improvement work if the gift does not exceed a value of five dollars ($5) and only one such gift is given in connection with any one transaction.

(c) No salesperson or contractor’s agent may accept any compensation of any kind, for or on account of a home improvement transaction, or any other transaction involving a work of improvement, from any person other than the contractor whom he or she represents with respect to the transaction, nor shall the salesperson or agent make any payment to any person other than his or her employer on account of the sales transaction.

(d) No contractor shall pay, credit, or allow any consideration or compensation of any kind to any other contractor or salesperson other than a licensee for or on account of the performance of any work of
 improvement or services, including, but not limited to, home improvement work or services, except: (1) where the person to or from whom the consideration is to be paid is not subject to or is exempted from the licensing requirements of this chapter, or (2) where the transaction is not subject to the requirements of this chapter.

As used in this section “owners” shall also mean “tenant.”

Commission of any act prohibited by this section is a misdemeanor and constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 813, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

7158.

(a) Any person who shall accept or receive a completion certificate or other evidence that performance of a contract for a work of improvement, including, but not limited to, a home improvement, is complete or satisfactorily concluded, with knowledge that the document is false and that the performance is not substantially completed, and who shall utter, offer, or use the document in connection with the making or accepting of any assignment or negotiation of the right to receive any payment from the owner, under or in connection with a contract, or for the purpose of obtaining or granting any credit or loan on the security of the right to receive any payment shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or to
 imprisonment in the county jail for a term of not less than one month nor more than one year, or both.

(b) (1) Any person who violates this section as part of a plan or scheme to defraud an owner of a residential or nonresidential structure, including a mobilehome or manufactured home, in connection with the offer or performance of repairs to the structure for damage caused by a natural disaster, shall be ordered by the court to make full restitution to the victim based on the person’s ability to pay, defined as the overall capability of the defendant to reimburse the costs, or a portion of the costs, including consideration of, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The defendant’s present financial position.

(B) The defendant’s reasonably discernible future financial position, provided
 that the court shall not consider a period of more than one year from the date of the hearing for purposes of determining the reasonably discernible future financial position of the defendant.

(C) The likelihood that the defendant will be able to obtain employment within one year from the date of the hearing.

(D) Any other factor that may bear upon the defendant’s financial capability to reimburse the county for costs.

(2) In addition to full restitution, and imprisonment authorized by subdivision (a), the court may impose a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), based upon the defendant’s ability to pay. This subdivision applies to natural disasters for which a state of emergency is proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government
 Code or for which an emergency or major disaster is declared by the President of the United States.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 92, Sec. 4.   (AB 1869)   Effective September 18, 2020.   Operative July 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7159.

(a) (1) This section identifies the projects for which a home improvement contract is required, outlines the contract requirements, and lists the items that shall be included in the contract, or may be provided as an attachment.

(2) This section does not apply to service and repair contracts that are subject to Section 7159.10, if the contract for the applicable services complies with Sections 7159.10 to 7159.14, inclusive.

(3) This section does not apply to the sale, installation, and servicing of a fire alarm sold in conjunction with an alarm system, as defined in Section 7590.1, if all costs attributable to making the fire alarm system operable, including sale and
 installation costs, do not exceed five hundred dollars ($500), and the licensee complies with the requirements set forth in Section 7159.9.

(4) This section does not apply to any costs associated with monitoring a burglar or fire alarm system.

(5) (A) Failure by the licensee, their agent or salesperson, or by a person subject to be licensed under this chapter, to provide the specified information, notices, and disclosures in the contract, or to otherwise fail to comply with any provision of this section, is cause for discipline.

(B) For purposes of administrative discipline under this chapter, the prime or direct contractor is responsible for completion of the project in accordance with the home improvement contract, plans, and specifications. This prime or direct contractor responsibility shall not preclude administrative discipline against any subcontractor or home improvement salesperson on a home improvement contract for violation of this chapter.

(6) If the applicable “Notice of Cancellation” is not included in or attached to the contract as required by this section, the buyer may file a complaint with the Contractors State License Board.

(b) For purposes of this section, “home improvement contract” means an
 agreement, whether oral or written, or contained in one or more documents, between a contractor and an owner or between a contractor and a tenant, regardless of the number of residence or dwelling units contained in the building in which the tenant resides, if the work is to be performed in, to, or upon the residence or dwelling unit of the tenant, for the performance of a home improvement, as defined in Section 7151, and includes all labor, services, and materials to be furnished and performed thereunder, if the aggregate contract price specified in one or more improvement contracts, including all labor, services, and materials to be furnished by the contractor, exceeds five hundred dollars ($500). “Home improvement contract” also means an agreement, whether oral or written, or contained in one or more documents, between a salesperson, whether or not they are a home improvement salesperson, and an owner or a tenant, regardless of the number of residence or dwelling units contained in the building in which
 the tenant resides, which provides for the sale, installation, or furnishing of home improvement goods or services.

(c) In addition to the specific requirements listed under this section, every home improvement contract and any person subject to licensure under this chapter or their agent or salesperson shall comply with all of the following:

(1) The writing shall be legible.

(2) Any printed form shall be readable. Unless a larger typeface is specified in this article, text in any printed form shall be in at least 10-point typeface and the headings shall be in at least 10-point boldface type.

(3) (A) Before any work is started, the contractor shall give the buyer a copy of the contract
 that is signed and dated by both the contractor and the buyer. The buyer’s receipt of the copy of the contract initiates the buyer’s rights to cancel the contract pursuant to Sections 1689.5 to 1689.14, inclusive, of the Civil Code.

(B) The contract shall contain on the first page, in a typeface no smaller than that generally used in the body of the document, both of the following:

(i) The date the buyer signed the contract.

(ii) The
 name, address, and email address of the contractor to whom the applicable “Notice of Cancellation” is to be sent, immediately preceded by a statement advising the buyer that the “Notice of Cancellation” may be sent to the contractor at the address or email address noted on the contract.

(iii) The telephone number of the
 contractor, or the contractor’s representative, to assist the buyer with locating and filling out the “Notice of Cancellation.”

(4) The contract shall include a statement that, upon satisfactory payment being made for any portion of the work performed, the contractor, prior to any further payment being made, shall furnish to the person contracting for the home improvement or swimming pool work a full and unconditional release from any potential lien claimant claim or mechanics lien authorized pursuant to Sections 8400 and 8404 of the Civil Code for that portion of the work for which payment has been made.

(5) A change-order form for changes or extra work shall be incorporated into the contract and shall become part of the contract only if it is in writing and signed by the parties prior to the commencement of any work covered by a change order.

(6) The contract shall contain, in close proximity to the signatures of the owner and contractor, a notice stating that the owner or tenant has the right to require the contractor to have a performance and payment bond.

(7) (A) The contract shall contain a statement regarding whether or not a subcontractor will be used on the project, including a portion to be checked in response, as follows:

[__] Yes

[__] No

(B) If checked “Yes,” indicating that a subcontractor will be used on the project, the contract shall contain a disclaimer that states the following:

“One or more subcontractors will
 be used on this project, and the contractor is aware that a list of subcontractors is required to be provided, upon request, along with the names, contact information, license number, and classification of those subcontractors.”

(C) If there is a change order during the project, the same disclaimer set forth in subparagraph (B) shall be on each change order.

(8) If the contract provides for a contractor to furnish joint control, the contractor shall not have any financial or other interest in the joint control.

(9) The provisions of this section are not exclusive and do not relieve the contractor from compliance with any other applicable provision of law.

(d) A home improvement contract and any changes to the contract shall be in writing and signed by the parties to the contract prior to the commencement of work covered by the contract or an applicable change order and, except as provided in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 7159.5, shall include or comply with all of the following:

(1) The name, business address, and license number of the contractor.

(2) If applicable, the name and registration number of the home improvement salesperson that
 solicited or negotiated the contract.

(3) The following heading on the contract form that identifies the type of contract in at least 10-point boldface type: “Home Improvement.”

(4) The following statement in at least 12-point boldface type: “You are entitled to a completely filled in copy of this agreement, signed by both you and the contractor, before any work may be started.”

(5) The heading: “Contract Price,” followed by the amount of the contract in dollars and cents.

(6) If a finance charge will be charged, the heading: “Finance Charge,” followed by the amount in dollars and cents. The finance charge is to be set out separately from the contract amount.

(7) The heading: “Description
 of the Project and Description of the Significant Materials to be Used and Equipment to be Installed,” followed by a description of the project and a description of the significant materials to be used and equipment to be installed. For swimming pools, the project description required under this paragraph also shall include a plan and scale drawing showing the shape, size, dimensions, and the construction and equipment specifications.

(8) If a downpayment will be charged, the details of the downpayment shall be expressed in substantially the following form, and shall include the text of the notice as specified in subparagraph (C):

(A) The heading: “Downpayment.”

(B) A space where the actual downpayment appears.

(C) The following statement in at least
 12-point boldface type:
“THE DOWNPAYMENT MAY NOT EXCEED $1,000 OR 10 PERCENT OF THE CONTRACT PRICE, WHICHEVER IS LESS.”
(9) If payments, other than the downpayment, are to be made before the project is completed, the details of these payments, known as progress payments, shall be expressed in substantially the following form, and shall include the text of the statement as specified in subparagraph (C):

(A) A schedule of progress payments shall be preceded by the heading: “Schedule of Progress Payments.”

(B) Each progress payment shall be stated in dollars and cents and specifically reference the amount of work or services to be performed and materials and equipment to be supplied.

(C) The section of the contract reserved for the progress payments shall include the following statement in at least 12-point boldface type:
“The schedule of progress payments must specifically describe each phase of work, including the type and amount of work or services scheduled to be supplied in each phase, along with the amount of each proposed progress payment. IT IS AGAINST THE LAW FOR A CONTRACTOR TO COLLECT PAYMENT FOR WORK NOT YET COMPLETED, OR FOR MATERIALS NOT YET DELIVERED. HOWEVER, A CONTRACTOR MAY REQUIRE A DOWNPAYMENT.”
(10) The contract shall address the commencement of work to be performed in substantially the following form:

(A) A statement that describes what constitutes
 substantial commencement of work under the contract.

(B) The heading: “Approximate Start Date.”

(C) The approximate date on which work will be commenced.

(11) The estimated completion date of the work shall be referenced in the contract in substantially the following form:

(A) The heading: “Approximate Completion Date.”

(B) The approximate date of completion.

(12) If applicable, the heading: “List of Documents to be Incorporated into the Contract,” followed by the list of documents incorporated into the contract.

(13) The heading: “Note About Extra Work and
 Change Orders,” followed by the following statement:
“Extra Work and Change Orders become part of the contract once the order is prepared in writing and signed by the parties prior to the commencement of work covered by the new change order. The order must describe the scope of the extra work or change, the cost to be added or subtracted from the contract, and the effect the order will have on the schedule of progress payments.”
(e) Except as provided in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 7159.5, all of the following notices shall be provided to the owner as part of the contract form as specified or, if otherwise authorized under this subdivision, may be provided as an attachment to the contract:

(1) A notice concerning commercial general
 liability insurance. This notice may be provided as an attachment to the contract if the contract includes the following statement: “A notice concerning commercial general liability insurance is attached to this contract.” The notice shall include the heading “Commercial General Liability Insurance (CGL),” followed by whichever of the following statements is both relevant and correct:

(A) “(The name on the license or ‛This contractor’) does not carry commercial general liability insurance.”

(B) “(The name on the license or ‛This contractor’) carries commercial general liability insurance written by (the insurance company). You may call (the insurance company) at __________ to check the contractor’s insurance coverage.”

(C) “(The name on the license or ‛This contractor’) is self-insured.”

(D) “(The name on the license or ‘This contractor’) is a limited liability company that carries liability insurance or maintains other security as required by law. You may call (the insurance company or trust company or bank) at ____ to check on the contractor’s insurance coverage or security.”

(2) A notice concerning workers’ compensation insurance. This notice may be provided as an attachment to the contract if the contract includes the statement: “A notice concerning workers’ compensation insurance is attached to this contract.” The notice shall include the heading “Workers’ Compensation Insurance” followed by whichever of the following statements is correct:

(A) “(The name on the license or ‛This contractor’) has no employees and is exempt from workers’ compensation requirements.”

(B) “(The name on the license or ‛This contractor’) carries workers’ compensation insurance for all employees.”

(3) A notice that provides the buyer with the following information about the performance of extra or change-order work:

(A) A statement that the buyer may not require a contractor to perform extra or change-order work without providing written authorization prior to the commencement of work covered by the new change order.

(B) A statement informing the buyer that extra work or a change order is not enforceable against a buyer unless the change order also identifies all of the following in writing prior to the commencement of work covered by the new change order:

(i) The scope of
 work encompassed by the order.

(ii) The amount to be added or subtracted from the contract.

(iii) The effect the order will make in the progress payments or the completion date.

(C) A statement informing the buyer that the contractor’s failure to comply with the requirements of this paragraph does not preclude the recovery of compensation for work performed based upon legal or equitable remedies designed to prevent unjust enrichment.

(4) A notice with the heading “Mechanics Lien Warning” written as follows:

“MECHANICS LIEN WARNING:
Anyone who helps improve your property, but who is
 not paid, may record what is called a mechanics lien on your property. A mechanics lien is a claim, like a mortgage or home equity loan, made against your property and recorded with the county recorder.

Even if you pay your contractor in full, unpaid subcontractors, suppliers, and laborers who helped to improve your property may record mechanics liens and sue you in court to foreclose the lien. If a court finds the lien is valid, you could be forced to pay twice or have a court officer sell your home to pay the lien. Liens can also affect your credit.

To preserve their right to record a lien, each subcontractor and material supplier must provide you with a document called a ‘Preliminary Notice.’ This notice is not a lien. The purpose of the notice is to let you know that the person who sends you the notice has the right to record a lien on your property if they are not paid.

BE
 CAREFUL. The Preliminary Notice can be sent up to 20 days after the subcontractor starts work or the supplier provides material. This can be a big problem if you pay your contractor before you have received the Preliminary Notices.

You will not get Preliminary Notices from your prime contractor or from laborers who work on your project. The law assumes that you already know they are improving your property.

PROTECT YOURSELF FROM LIENS. You can protect yourself from liens by getting a list from your contractor of all the subcontractors and material suppliers that work on your project. Find out from your contractor when these subcontractors started work and when these suppliers delivered goods or materials. Then wait 20 days, paying attention to the Preliminary Notices you receive.

PAY WITH JOINT CHECKS. One way to
 protect yourself is to pay with a joint check. When your contractor tells you it is time to pay for the work of a subcontractor or supplier who has provided you with a Preliminary Notice, write a joint check payable to both the contractor and the subcontractor or material supplier.

For other ways to prevent liens, visit CSLB’s internet website at www.cslb.ca.gov or call CSLB at 800-321-CSLB (2752).

REMEMBER, IF YOU DO NOTHING, YOU RISK HAVING A LIEN PLACED ON YOUR HOME. This can mean that you may have to pay twice, or face the forced sale of your home to pay what you owe.”
(5) The following notice shall be provided in at least 12-point typeface:
“Information about the Contractors State License Board (CSLB): CSLB is the state consumer
 protection agency that licenses and regulates construction contractors.

Contact CSLB for information about the licensed contractor you are considering, including information about disclosable complaints, disciplinary actions, and civil judgments that are reported to CSLB.
